apertium-mk-bg.bg.dix
    <pardef n="влад/е__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ях</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>яхме</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>я</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>яхте</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>я</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>яха</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ял</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="part"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>яла</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="part"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>яло</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="part"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ели</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="part"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>еейки</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ей</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ейте</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ян</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pass"/><s n="part"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>яна</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pass"/><s n="part"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>яно</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pass"/><s n="part"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ени</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pass"/><s n="part"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>еех</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>еехме</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ееше</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>еехте</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ееше</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ееха</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>еел</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="part"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>еела</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="part"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>еело</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="part"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>еели</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="part"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ея</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>еем</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ееш</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>еете</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ее</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>еят</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>еещ</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="part"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ееща</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="part"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>еещо</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="part"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>еещи</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="part"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>еене</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="владе"><i>влад</i><par n="влад/е__vblex"/></e>
